src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/es.dic
abunda/rt
abund /tr
acabado/kGS
ac nito/S
adoratorio/S
agon a/S
aguar/RhiEDr
ag en/rih
ajomate/S
alcen/rp
alcoholaturo/S
alimentabais/r
alimentado/rS
aliment ndose/r
aliment ramos/r
alimentar /r
alimentaremos/r
alimentare/rGS
alimentar a/rS
aliment semos/r
alimentasteis/r
aliment /r
ali  ndolo/GS
alumbrador/GS
alzad/rp
alz /rp
amplitud/S
animice/S
a aden/r
a adi /r
a ado/r
apart ndole/GS
aproxime/SG
arar/pRrDE
ar /ptr
armon a/S
artille/GSh
asad/r
as /r
atabladera/S
auricular/eS
austral/S
babor/S
bandola/S
barr is/r
barr is/r
barrer /r
barrer /r
barrer a/rS
barr an/r
barriendo/r
barrieran/r
barrieren/r
barri semos/r
barri /ri
bastarle/S
beba/ihr
beben/irh
beb /rhi
besana/S
bocaza/S
botavante/S
bufalino/GS
cacique/SG
calm ndole/GS
cama/brSpaih
canelero/S
capsulares/e
caracoleta/S
carbonato/eS
carg bamos/r
carg is/rph
cargan/iprh
cargaran/hpr
cargare/hGSpr
carg remos/r
cargar amos/r
cargarlo/rSGh
cargaseis/rh
cargaste/hpr
cargue/hSipr
carrasque o/GS
catorce/S
ceja/prS
cena/gr
cenen/r
censurable/kS
centenario/eS
cercos/r
chamarilero/GS
chocoano/GS
ciclo/ep
ciclos/e
circense/S
coca/heSa
cocci n/Sg
coge/bSphraji
cogen/bprajhi
coger /jrbhi
coger amos/jr
cogernos/ir
cog ais/rbhji
cogido/rSGhbji
cogieran/bjr
cogieren/bjr
cogiese/riShbj
cogiste/rhbji
cojo/bGphraji
colombianismo/S
comporte/SG
confortamiento/S
contero/GS
convexa/e
convexo/GSe
copiarlo/GS
corvaza/S
crece/hrSpga
crecer n/r
creceremos/r
crecer an/r
crec amos/r
crecido/rGS
creci ramos/r
creci remos/r
crecieseis/r
crecimos/r
crezca/hpgar
crome/GS
cueva/iS
curad/rop
cur /rpo
decimal/S
d /hep
deprecatorio/GS
desiste/GS
devoci n/S
d melo/SG
distrae/S
dones/e
dorado/hSrp
dorarais/hr
dorareis/hr
dorar a/pSrh
dorasteis/r
dosificable/S
dosis/r
educando/GS
embecadura/S
emulador/GS
encrespadura/S
enhatije/GS
enquistad/e
enquista/e
enquistar/eRD
enquist /e
enquiste/eGS
enquisten/e
enquisto/e
enquist /e
en/set
enternecedor/SG
erecto/GS
escob n/S
espadarte/S
esqueje/GS
est mago/S
examen/S
exceda/r
excedo/rL
excito/r
extraling  stico/GS
fase/hS
filos fico/GS
flora/uaeih
floro/uaeGih
focal/eS
foral/S
formes/qe
frior/S
galletero/SG
ganan/rha
gas/efhjk
gencian ceo/SG
giran/r
gong/S
gotera/eS
guan bano/S
haci ndotelo/SG
heptas labo/GS
herido/rSG
hilv n/SG
hoplita/S
husme/GS
impresa/pr
imprimi /rp
incensario/S
inhospitable/S
invaluable/S
jarifiano/GS
junqueral/S
labial/eS
l mpara/S
lechoso/GS
liares/e
licia/gS
liosa/e
lioso/SGe
lixivie/GS
llar/eS
llenad/rp
llevad/fr
llev /fr
loca/afe
loco/aGef
lucro/S
magnetof nico/SG
mana/hpeaoS
mancera/S
manos/bre
marce/GS
materialista/S
melillense/S
mensuales/e
mesonista/S
metalista/eS
minifalda/S
mojone/aSG
moralina/S
muge/GS
naba/jSle
naden/r
nado/jGrle
na/loejbt
narigueto/GS
ne/lpej
nen/ejl
nicotinismo/S
nutria/S
oleoducto/S
oriflama/S
paga/oaprS
palabrero/SGL
papaverina/S
partitura/S
pas is/oprh
pas ramos/r
pas remos/r
pasarla/rp
pasase/hrpo
pasemos/hopr
pecina/iS
pensaba/pS
perpendicular/SK
pidi ndoselo/GS
pint bamos/r
pint ndose/r
pintar s/hpr
pintar ais/r
pintasen/rph
pinte/pGShr
pitarle/GS
plano/ae
planos/e
plaza/aiehS
pobrero/S
polar/Sel
pone/uSokgptalnbr
porche/S
predecesor/GS
primado/rGS
probadura/S
prudente/FkS
puja/pri
quebrantable/Sk
racimo/S
razonador/GS
rect ngulos/e
refrendata/S
reparativo/SG
reta/e
rete/eSG
retina/eaS
retroguardia/S
ria/ea
rodenal/S
ropas/r
ruinoso/SG
saldorija/S
saliente/rS
saltaba/rSp
saltando/rp
salta/pear
saltaran/rp
saltar /pr
saltaron/rp
saltas/rSp
salto/rSpeaG
san/ea
sayo/ieSG
sean/gra
secad/egp
seca/gpeS
secan/egp
secar/eRgEpD
sec /egp
sector/Se
secuestre/SG
se/eSa
s is/ea
sel/eS
semanal/eS
semos/e
sen/ea
sequ /egp
sexual/aSe
silvestre/S
soja/geS
solad/raskfg
sordomudo/GMS
suele/sSGfrga
sulfuro/eS
tabas/epf
tajadero/GS
tamos/pef
tan/epa
tara/aehfp
taran/hepf
tare/aGSehpf
tar /apfhe
tase/aefSp
tasen/epf
te/eGSpa
t /epf
ten/epa
tensas/hS
tolete/S
tongo/eS
toque/hSpe
trasguero/GS
turbio/MGSK
un voca/eS
valva/eS
veinteno/GS
venid/afongplrst
vestid/hikrp
vierte/frkSGsp
violeto/GS
visto/nikroGpahj
vivi /fhpr
vuela/pr
zaya/S
